Maine, session 132, LD1289.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §737-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 304, Pt. A, §22,
is further amended to read:
1. Deposit for legislative or single county office recount. This subsection applies to
a recount for an election for the office of State Senator or State Representative or for a
county office that does not encompass more than one county. All deposits required by this
section must be made with the Secretary of State when a recount is requested by a losing
candidate or an undeclared write-in candidate. Once the sworn law enforcement officers
or the State Police have taken custody of the ballots and other election materials from the
municipalities, the deposit made by the candidate requesting the recount is forfeited to the
State if the resulting count fails to change the outcome of the election. If the recount
reverses the election, the deposit must be returned to the candidate requesting the recount.
The amount of the deposit is calculated as follows.
A. If the percentage difference shown by the official tabulation between the leading
candidate and the requesting candidate is 1.5% 0.75% or less of the total votes cast for
that office, a deposit is not required.
B. If the percentage difference shown by the official tabulation between the leading
candidate and the requesting candidate is more than 1.5% 0.75% and less than or equal
to 4% 2% of the total votes cast for that office, the deposit is $500.
C. If the percentage difference shown by the official tabulation between the leading
candidate and the requesting candidate is more than 4% 2% and less than or equal to
6% 3% of the total votes cast for that office, the deposit is $1,000.
D. If the percentage difference shown by the official tabulation between the leading
candidate and the requesting candidate is more than 6% 3% and less than or equal to
8% 4% of the total votes cast for that office, the deposit is $2,500.
E. If the percentage difference shown by the official tabulation between the leading
candidate and the requesting candidate is more than 8% 4% and less than or equal to
10% 5% of the total votes cast for that office, the deposit is $5,000.
F. If the percentage difference shown by the official tabulation between the leading
candidate and the requesting candidate is more than 10% 5% of the total votes cast for
that office, the deposit is $10,000.
After completion of the recount, if the recount has not changed the result of the election,
the Secretary of State shall calculate the actual cost of the recount, including payroll costs
for the state workers necessary to staff the recount, which must be paid by the requesting
candidate. If the deposit paid under this subsection is greater than the actual cost of the
recount, the Secretary of State shall refund to the requesting candidate the amount of
overpayment. If the actual cost of the recount is greater than the deposit, the requesting
candidate shall pay the remainder of the cost to the Secretary of State.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §737-A, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 304, Pt. A,
§23, is further amended to read:
1-A. Deposit for statewide or multicounty office recount. This subsection applies
to a recount for an office not described by subsection 1. A losing candidate who requests
Page 1 - 132LR1846(01)

413 a recount must pay the deposit required by this subsection when the recount is requested.
424 The amount of the deposit is calculated as follows.
A. If the difference shown by the official tabulation between the leading candidate and
the requesting candidate is 1% 0.5% or less of the total votes cast for that office or not
more than 1,000 500 votes, whichever is less, a deposit is not required. A candidate
who is not required to pay a deposit pursuant to this subsection may not be charged for
the recount regardless of whether the procedure changes the result of the election.
B. If the difference shown by the official tabulation between the leading candidate and
the requesting candidate is more than 1% 0.5% of the total votes cast for that office or
more than 1,000 500 votes, whichever is less, the deposit is $5,000 or 10% of the
reasonable estimate of the cost to the State of performing the first stage of the recount,
whichever is greater. After completion of the recount, if the recount has not changed
the result of the election, the Secretary of State shall calculate the actual cost of the
procedure, including payroll costs for the state workers necessary to staff the recount,
which must be paid by the requesting candidate. If the deposit is greater than the actual
cost, the overpayment must be refunded to the candidate. If the actual cost is greater
than the deposit, the candidate shall pay the remainder of the actual cost to the State.
Once the sworn law enforcement officers or the State Police have taken custody of the
ballots and other election materials for the first stage of the recount, the deposit made
by the candidate requesting the recount is forfeited to the State even if the candidate
withdraws from the recount before the recount begins. If a recount reverses the
election, the deposit must be returned to the candidate requesting the recount.